Utah statutes.
31A-5-206.   Sale of securities by authorized insurer.
  A domestic insurer that has already received a certificate of authority may
issue additional securities to obtain further financing, after obtaining a
solicitation permit from the commissioner.  The organizational permit
requirements in Section 31A-5-204 apply if the commissioner prescribes its
application.  The phrase "organization permit" in Section 31A-5-204 means
"solicitation permit" when being applied to this section.  The solicitation
permit terminates one year from the date of its issuance.  However, this
permit may be extended for not more than one additional year by the
commissioner on terms he considers sufficient to protect the policyholders,
the shareholders, and the public.
